Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.180

Staggered corporate license renewal system authorized.

The secretary of state may, by rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW, adopt and implement a system of renewals for annual corporate licenses or filings in which the renewal dates are staggered throughout the year.

To facilitate the implementation of the staggered system, the secretary of state may extend the duration of corporate licensing periods or report filing periods and may impose and collect such additional proportional fees as may be required on account of the extended periods.

[ 1982 c 35 s 192.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.